Illinois, session 104th, HB3940.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated for the 7objects and purposes hereinafter named, to meet the ordinary 8and contingent expenses of the Property Tax Appeal Board:9Payable from the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund:10  For Personal Services.............................6,292,00011  For Contributions to the State12   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,206,80013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security....................................481,40015  For Group Insurance...............................2,158,00016  For Contractual Services............................725,00017  For Travel...........................................39,00018  For Commodities......................................12,50019  For Printing..........................................5,50020  For Equipment.........................................5,80021  For Electronic Data Processing......................336,00022  For Telecommunication Services.......................45,50023  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................9,100  HB3940- 2 -OMB104 00107 AAV 10107 b1  For Refunds.............................................2002  For Costs Associated with the Appeal3   Process and Office Relocation......................400,0004    Total                                         $13,716,800 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62025.